tests/possessives_plural_wiki_sakhatyla.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "Possessive cases plural": 
 
    ат<n><pl><px1sg><nom> : аттарым
    ат<n><pl><px1sg><acc> : аттарбын
    ат<n><pl><px1sg><par> : аттарбына
    ат<n><pl><px1sg><dat> : аттарбар
    ат<n><pl><px1sg><abl> : аттарбыттан
    ат<n><pl><px1sg><ins> : аттарбынан
    ат<n><pl><px1sg><com> : аттарбыныын
    ат<n><pl><px1sg><comp> : аттарбынааҕар

    ат<n><pl><px2sg><nom> : аттарыҥ
    ат<n><pl><px2sg><acc> : аттаргын
    ат<n><pl><px2sg><par> : аттаргына
    ат<n><pl><px2sg><dat> : аттаргар
    ат<n><pl><px2sg><abl> : аттаргыттан
    ат<n><pl><px2sg><ins> : аттаргынан
    ат<n><pl><px2sg><com> : аттаргыныын
    ат<n><pl><px2sg><comp> : аттаргынааҕар

    ат<n><pl><px3sg><nom> : аттара
    ат<n><pl><px3sg><acc> : аттарын
    ат<n><pl><px3sg><par> : аттарына
    ат<n><pl><px3sg><dat> : аттарыгар
    ат<n><pl><px3sg><abl> : аттарыттан
    ат<n><pl><px3sg><ins> : аттарынан
    ат<n><pl><px3sg><com> : аттарыныын
    ат<n><pl><px3sg><comp> : аттарынааҕар

    ат<n><pl><px1pl><nom> : аттарбыт
    ат<n><pl><px1pl><acc> : аттарбытын
    ат<n><pl><px1pl><par> : аттарбытына
    ат<n><pl><px1pl><dat> : аттарбытыгар
    ат<n><pl><px1pl><abl> : аттарбытыттан
    ат<n><pl><px1pl><ins> : аттарбытытынан
    ат<n><pl><px1pl><com> : аттарбытыныын
    ат<n><pl><px1pl><comp> : аттарбытынааҕар

    ат<n><pl><px2pl><nom> : аттаргыт
    ат<n><pl><px2pl><acc> : аттаргытын
    ат<n><pl><px2pl><par> : аттаргытына
    ат<n><pl><px2pl><dat> : аттаргытыгар
    ат<n><pl><px2pl><abl> : аттаргытыттан
    ат<n><pl><px2pl><ins> : аттаргытынан
    ат<n><pl><px2pl><com> : аттаргытыныын
    ат<n><pl><px2pl><comp> : аттаргытынааҕар

    ат<n><pl><px3pl><nom> : аттара
    ат<n><pl><px3pl><acc> : аттарын
    ат<n><pl><px3pl><par> : аттарына
    ат<n><pl><px3pl><dat> : аттарыгар
    ат<n><pl><px3pl><abl> : аттарыттан
    ат<n><pl><px3pl><ins> : аттарынан
    ат<n><pl><px3pl><com> : аттарыныын
    ат<n><pl><px3pl><comp> : аттарынааҕар
